Idaho, session 2025, S1084.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. That Section 42-1764, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
42-1764. SUBSTITUTION FOR TRANSFER PROCEEDING -- RIGHTS NOT SUBJECT
TO FORFEITURE -- NO DEDICATION OF RIGHTS. (1) The approval of a rental of wa-
ter from the water supply bank may be a substitute for the transfer proceed-
ing requirements of section 42-222, Idaho Code.
(2) Water rights obtained by the board or by a local committee appointed
by the board and credited to the water supply bank are not subject to forfei-
ture for nonuse pursuant to section 42-222(2), Idaho Code, while retained in
or rented from the water supply bank. The five (5) year period of nonuse for
forfeiture of a water right shall begin to accrue run anew upon removal of a
right from the bank by the owner of the right if a period of nonuse did not oc-
cur prior to the date of acceptance of the right into the bank. The five (5)
year period of nonuse shall continue to accrue if a period of nonuse occurred
prior to the effective date of acceptance of the right into the bank and the
right was not beneficially used while in the bank.
(3) The rental of water rights from the water supply bank shall not con-
stitute a dedication to the lands of any renter since the rental or distri-
bution of water by the water bank is only incidental to its primary purposes
listed in section 42-1761, Idaho Code.
SECTION 2. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after
July 1, 2025.